Washington statutes.
RCW 43.84.080

Investment of current state funds.

Wherever there is in any fund or in cash balances in the state treasury more than sufficient to meet the current expenditures properly payable therefrom, the state treasurer may invest or reinvest such portion of such funds or balances as the state treasurer deems expedient in the following:

(1) Certificates, notes, or bonds of the United States, or other obligations of the United States or its agencies, or of any corporation wholly owned by the government of the United States or United States dollar denominated bonds, notes, or other obligations that are issued or guaranteed by supranational institutions, provided that, at the time of investment, the institution has the United States government as its largest shareholder;

(2) In state, county, municipal, or school district bonds, notes, or in warrants of taxing districts of the state. Such bonds and warrants shall be only those found to be within the limit of indebtedness prescribed by law for the taxing district issuing them and to be general obligations. The state treasurer may purchase such bonds or warrants directly from the taxing district or in the open market at such prices and upon such terms as it may determine, and may sell them at such times as it deems advisable;

(3) In federal home loan bank notes and bonds, federal land bank bonds and federal national mortgage association notes, debentures and guaranteed certificates of participation, or the obligations of any other government sponsored corporation whose obligations are or may become eligible as collateral for advances to member banks as determined by the board of governors of the federal reserve system;

(4) Bankers' acceptances purchased on the secondary market;

(5) Commercial paper purchased on the secondary market, provided that the state treasurer adheres to the investment policies and procedures adopted by the state investment board;

(6) General obligation bonds of any state and general obligation bonds of local governments of other states, which bonds have at the time of investment one of the three highest credit ratings of a nationally recognized rating agency; and

(7) Corporate notes purchased on the secondary market, provided that the state treasurer adheres to the investment policies and procedures adopted by the state investment board.

[ 2016 c 152 s 18; 1982 c 148 s 1; 1981 c 3 s 18; 1979 ex.s. c 154 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 4 s 1; 1971 c 16 s 1; 1967 c 211 s 1; 1965 c 8 s 43.84.080. Prior: 1961 c 281 s 11; 1955 c 197 s 1; 1935 c 91 s 1; RRS s 5508-1.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1981 c 3: See notes following RCW 43.33A.010.

Severability—1961 c 281: See note following RCW 47.12.180.

Motor vehicle fund warrants for state highway acquisition: RCW 47.12.180 through 47.12.240.